en_US.aff
FLAG num
SFX 64 Y 62	
SFX 64 0 ති  .	
SFX 64 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 64 0 නවා  .	
SFX 64 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 64 0 නු  .	
SFX 64 0 න්න  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 64 0 මි  .	
SFX 64 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 64 0 මු  .	
SFX 64 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 64 0 යි  .	
SFX 64 0 ව  .	
SFX 64 0 වති  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 64 0 වමි  .	
SFX 64 0 වමු  .	
SFX 64 0 වයි  .	
SFX 64 0 වහි  .	
SFX 64 0 වහු  .	
SFX 64 0 වු  .	
SFX 64 0 හි  .	
SFX 64 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 64 0 හු  .	
SFX 64 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 64 0 මින්  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 64 0 නලද  .	
SFX 64 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 64 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 64 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 64 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 64 0 වු​ණු  .	
SFX 64 0 වේ  .	
SFX 64 0 වෙමි  .	
SFX 64 0 වෙමු  .	
SFX 64 0 වෙහි  .	
SFX 64 0 වෙහු  .	
SFX 64 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 64 0 වෙ​ති  .	
SFX 64 0 විය  .	
SFX 64 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 64 0 වන  .	
SFX 64 0 වනට  .	
SFX 64 0 වා  .	
SFX 64 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 64 0 වනුයේ  .	

SFX 71 Y 13	
SFX 71 ා ාපන්  .	
SFX 71 ා ාපල්ලා  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවොත්  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවේ  .	
SFX 71 ා ා  .	
SFX 71 ා ​ෑ  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවෙමි  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවෙමු  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවෙහි  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවෙහු  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවාය  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවේය  .	
SFX 71 ා ෑවෝය  .	

SFX 72 Y 13	
SFX 72 0 ාපන්  .	
SFX 72 0 ාපල්ලා  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවොත්  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවේ  .	
SFX 72 0 ා  .	
SFX 72 0 ​ෑ  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවෙමි  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවෙමු  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවෙහි  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවෙහු  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවාය  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවේය  .	
SFX 72 0 ෑවෝය  .	

SFX 65 Y 71	
SFX 65 0 ති  .	
SFX 65 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 65 0 නවා  .	
SFX 65 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 65 0 නු  .	
SFX 65 0 න්න  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ියන්  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ියල්ලා  .	
SFX 65 0 මි  .	
SFX 65 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 65 0 මු  .	
SFX 65 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 65 0 යි  .	
SFX 65 0 ව  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 65 0 වමි  .	
SFX 65 0 වමු  .	
SFX 65 0 වයි  .	
SFX 65 0 වති  .	
SFX 65 0 වහි  .	
SFX 65 0 වහු  .	
SFX 65 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 65 0 වු  .	
SFX 65 0 හි  .	
SFX 65 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 65 0 හු  .	
SFX 65 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 65 0 මින්  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ී  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 65 0 නලද  .	
SFX 65 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 65 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 65 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුණු  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ූ  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනෙමි  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනෙමු  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනෙහි  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනෙහු  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනේය  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනාය  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනෝය  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ වෙයි  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ වෙති  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ වේ  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ිය  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනොත්  .	
SFX 65 ‍ෙ ුනේ  .	
SFX 65 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 65 0 න  .	
SFX 65 0 නට  .	
SFX 65 0 වා  .	
SFX 65 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 65 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 66 Y 74	
SFX 66 0 ති  .	
SFX 66 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 66 0 නවා  .	
SFX 66 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 66 0 නු  .	
SFX 66 0 න්න  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නී  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නෝ  .	
SFX 66 0 මි  .	
SFX 66 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 66 0 මු  .	
SFX 66 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 66 0 යි  .	
SFX 66 0 ව  .	
SFX 66 0 වති  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නී  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නෝ  .	
SFX 66 0 වමි  .	
SFX 66 0 වමු  .	
SFX 66 0 වයි  .	
SFX 66 0 වහි  .	
SFX 66 0 වහු  .	
SFX 66 0 වු  .	
SFX 66 0 හි  .	
SFX 66 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 66 0 හු  .	
SFX 66 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 66 0 මින්  .	
SFX 66 0 හින්  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 66 0 නලද  .	
SFX 66 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 66 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 66 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 66 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවුණු  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවූ  .	
SFX 66 0 යෙමි  .	
SFX 66 0 යෙමු  .	
SFX 66 0 යෙහි  .	
SFX 66 0 යෙහු  .	
SFX 66 0 යාය  .	
SFX 66 0 යේය  .	
SFX 66 0 යෝය  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවේ  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවෙමි  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවෙමු  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවෙහි  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවෙහු  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවෙයි  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවෙති  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවවෙයි  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවවෙති  .	
SFX 66 0 ැවවේ  .	
SFX 66 0 ා  .	
SFX 66 0 යොත්  .	
SFX 66 0 ැව්වේ  .	
SFX 66 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 66 0 න  .	
SFX 66 0 වා  .	
SFX 66 0 වන්නේ  .	

SFX 67 Y 73	
SFX 67 0 ති  .	
SFX 67 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 67 0 නවා  .	
SFX 67 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 67 0 නු  .	
SFX 67 0 න්න  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ීපන්  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ීපල්ලා  .	
SFX 67 0 මි  .	
SFX 67 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 67 0 මු  .	
SFX 67 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 67 0 යි  .	
SFX 67 0 ව  .	
SFX 67 0 වති  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 67 0 වමි  .	
SFX 67 0 වමු  .	
SFX 67 0 වයි  .	
SFX 67 0 වහි  .	
SFX 67 0 වහු  .	
SFX 67 0 වු  .	
SFX 67 0 හි  .	
SFX 67 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 67 0 හු  .	
SFX 67 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 67 0 මින්  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ී  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 67 0 නලද  .	
SFX 67 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 67 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 67 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 67 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ුන්නු  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ුන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ුන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ුන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ුන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ුන්නේය  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ුන්නාය  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ුන්නෝය  .	
SFX 67 0 වේ  .	
SFX 67 0 වෙමි  .	
SFX 67 0 වෙමු  .	
SFX 67 0 වෙහි  .	
SFX 67 0 වෙහු  .	
SFX 67 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 67 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 67 ‍ෙ ිය  .	
SFX 67 0 ුන්නහොත්  .	
SFX 67 0 ුන්නේ  .	
SFX 67 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 67 0 න  .	
SFX 67 0 වා  .	
SFX 67 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 67 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 68 Y 43	
SFX 68 0 ති  .	
SFX 68 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 68 0 නවා  .	
SFX 68 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 68 0 නු  .	
SFX 68 0 න්න  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ  ීපන්  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ීපල්ලා  .	
SFX 68 0 මි  .	
SFX 68 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 68 0 මු  .	
SFX 68 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 68 0 යි  .	
SFX 68 0 මින්  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ී  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 68 0 නලද  .	
SFX 68 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 68 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 68 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ිවු  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ිව්වෙමි  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ිවුවෙමු  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ​ිව්වෙ​හි  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ​ිව්වෙ​හු  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ​ිව්වාය  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ිව්වේය  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ිව්වෝය  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ිය  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ිව්වොත්  .	
SFX 68 ා‍ෙ ිව්වේ  .	
SFX 68 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 68 0 න  .	
SFX 68 0 නුයේ  .		

SFX 69 Y 80	
SFX 69 0 කර  .	
SFX 69 0 ති  .	
SFX 69 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 69 0 නවා  .	
SFX 69 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 69 0 නු  .	
SFX 69 0 න්න  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 69 0 පන්  .	
SFX 69 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 69 0 මි  .	
SFX 69 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 69 0 මු  .	
SFX 69 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 69 0 යි  .	
SFX 69 0 ව  .	
SFX 69 0 වති  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 69 0 වමි  .	
SFX 69 0 වමු  .	
SFX 69 0 වයි  .	
SFX 69 0 වහි  .	
SFX 69 0 වහු  .	
SFX 69 0 වු  .	
SFX 69 0 හි  .	
SFX 69 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 69 0 හු  .	
SFX 69 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 69 0 ාවා  .	
SFX 69 0 මින්  .	
SFX 69 0 ා  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 69 0 නලද  .	
SFX 69 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 69 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 69 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 69 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 69 0 ුණු  .	
SFX 69 0 ූ  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවෙමි  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවෙමු  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවෙහි  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවෙහු  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවාය  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවේය  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවෝය  .	
SFX 69 0 ේ  .	
SFX 69 0 ෙමි  .	
SFX 69 0 ෙමු  .	
SFX 69 0 ෙහි  .	
SFX 69 0 ෙහු  .	
SFX 69 0 ෙයි  .	
SFX 69 0 ෙති  .	
SFX 69 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 69 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 69 0 වේ  .	
SFX 69 0 ිය  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවොත්  .	
SFX 69 0 ුවේ  .	
SFX 69 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 69 0 න  .	
SFX 69 0 නට  .	
SFX 69 0 කරවා  .	
SFX 69 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 69 0 නුයේ  .	
