en_US.dic
ක/64,72
ද/64,72
ල/64,72
ගා/64,71
නා/64,71
පා/64,71
බා/64,71
වා/64,71
හා/64,71
රඟපා/64,71
සා/64,71
වෙ/65	
රොක්වෙ/65	
පහවෙ/65	
බලාපොරොත්තුවෙ/65	
පසුවෙ/65	
පාළුවෙ/65	
වැඩිවෙ/65	
වැයවෙ/65	
හෙළිවෙ/65	
මතක්වෙ/65	
මුසුවෙ/65	
පසුවෙ/65	
පාළුවෙ/65	
පිටත්වෙ/65	
එක්වෙ/65	
හිරවෙ/65	
පළවෙ/65	
අස්වෙ/65	
හමුවෙ/65	
සමත්වෙ/65	
සිදුවෙ/65	
එරෙහිවෙ/65	
පදිංචිවෙ/65	
ඇතිවෙ/65	
ගතවෙ/65	
ය/66
දෙ/67
​බො/68
කර/69
